Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.030

Grading policies—Option to consider attendance.

Each school district board of directors may establish student grading policies which permit teachers to consider a student's attendance in determining the student's overall grade or deciding whether the student should be granted or denied credit. Such policies shall take into consideration the circumstances pertaining to the student's inability to attend school. However, no policy shall be adopted whereby a grade shall be reduced or credit shall be denied for disciplinary reasons only, rather than for academic reasons, unless due process of law is provided as set forth by the superintendent of public instruction under RCW 28A.600.015.

[ 2006 c 263 s 707; 1990 c 33 s 498; 1984 c 278 s 7. Formerly RCW 28A.58.195.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1984 c 278: See note following RCW 28A.185.010.